Maine, session 132, LD719.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 34-A MRSA §1210-E, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 732, Pt. A, §3
and affected by §5, is amended to read:
2. County Jail Operations Fund. The County Jail Operations Fund is established to
provide funding for county jails and the regional jail. State funding must be appropriated
annually for the fund in the an amount of $20,342,104 equal to 35% of the total cost of
operating the county jails and the regional jail as needed to meet the standards established
by the commissioner for county jails pursuant to sections 1208 and 1208-A, or otherwise
required by law, plus any additional amount the Legislature may appropriate. For purposes
of this section, the total cost of operating the county jails and the regional jail must reflect
the total cost of operating the county jails and the regional jail for the most recently
concluded fiscal year. The department shall administer the fund and shall distribute funds
to the jails in accordance with this section for the purposes set forth in subsections 3 and 4
and in accordance with the distribution formula set forth in subsection 9. County jails and
the regional jail may provide services that exceed the standards established pursuant to
sections 1208 and 1208-A or otherwise required by law, but the cost of providing such
services must be funded by the counties or from other sources outside of the fund.